Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-729
State boiler inspector; record of equipment.

The state boiler inspector shall keep in the office of the commissioner a complete and accurate record of the name of the owner or user of any boiler required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act and a full description of the equipment including the type, dimensions, age, condition, amount of pressure allowed, and date when last inspected.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 4(3), p. 394;

R.S.1943, § 48-709;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-709;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 11;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 8.